Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 20
PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

hoice of Entity: Using Limited Purpose Local Governments to Solve Problems", see 38

C

olo. Law. 59 (Oct. 2009).

Section

PART 1 SOLID WASTES DISPOSAL SITES
AND FACILITIES

PART 2 DISPOSAL DISTRICTS (1953 ACT)

PART 3 PUBLIC PROJECTS

PART 4 SEWER AND WATER SYSTEMS

PART 5 COUNTY PUBLIC IMPROVEMENT
DISTRICT ACT

PART 6 LOCAL IMPROVEMENT
DISTRICTS - COUNTIES

PART 7 RECREATION DISTRICTS - COUNTY

PART 8 CEMETERY DISTRICTS

PART 9 SOLID WASTE-TO-ENERGY
INCINERATION SYSTEMS

PART 10 SOLID WASTES DISPOSAL LIMITATIONS

PART 11 PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS - COUNTY CONTRACTS

PART 12 RURAL CLEAN ENERGY
PROJECT FINANCE PROGRAM

PART 13 FEDERAL MINERAL LEASE DISTRICTS

PART 14 STRATEGIES FOR WASTE TIRES